Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4997.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [604.115] CHATBOT PROHIBITIONS; LIABILITY. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Artificial intelligence system" or "AI system" means any machine-based system that, for any explicit or implicit object, infers from the inputs the system receives how to generate outputs including content, decisions, predictions, or recommendations that influence a physical or virtual environment. Artificial intelligence does not include any software used primarily for basic computerized processes, such as antimalware or antivirus software, autocorrect functions, calculators, databases, data storage, electronic communications, firewall systems, Internet domain registration, Internet website loading, networking, spam and robocall filtering, spellcheck tools, spreadsheets, web caching, web hosting, or any tool that relates only to internal management affairs such as ordering office supplies or processing payments. new text end new text begin (c) "Chatbot" means an artificial intelligence system, software program, or technological application that simulates human-like conversation and interaction through text messages, voice commands, or a combination thereof to provide information and services to users. new text end new text begin (d) "Companion chatbot" means a chatbot that is designed to provide human-like interaction that simulates an interpersonal relationship with a user or group of users as its primary function, including using previous user interactions to help simulate an interpersonal relationship in future user interactions. An interpersonal relationship simulates a relationship between a human user and a chatbot similar to a romantic, platonic, familial, adversarial, professional, official, therapeutic, or stranger relationship and can include fictional or nonfictional characters. new text end new text begin (e) "Human-like" means any form of communication or interaction that approximates human behavior, including nonhuman behavior that could be attributed to a human actor, such as a human actor role-playing as a fictional nonhuman character, an animal, or other interactive entity. new text end new text begin (f) "Proprietor" means any person, business, company, organization, institution, or government entity that owns, operates, or deploys a chatbot system used to interact with users. Proprietor does not include a third-party developer that licenses the developer's chatbot technology to a proprietor and does not maintain direct control of the chatbot system. new text end new text begin (g) "User" means a human user of a chatbot who is located in Minnesota when they are using the chatbot. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Prohibited actions by a chatbot; liability. new text end new text begin (a) A proprietor of a chatbot must not permit the chatbot to provide any substantive response, information, or advice or take any action that, if taken by a natural person, would require a license under either: new text end new text begin (1) chapter 147 or 148E, or similar statutes, requiring a professional license for mental health or medical care; or new text end new text begin (2) section 481.02 and related laws and professional regulations, requiring a professional license to provide legal advice. new text end new text begin (b) A proprietor may not waive or disclaim this liability merely by notifying users, as required under this section, that the user is interacting with a nonhuman chatbot system. A person may bring a civil action to recover general and special damages for violations of this section. If it is found that a proprietor has willfully violated this section, the violator is liable for those damages together with court costs and reasonable attorney fees and disbursements incurred by the person bringing the action. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Notice required. new text end new text begin Proprietors utilizing chatbots accessed by a user who is in this state must provide clear, conspicuous, and explicit notice to a user that the user is interacting with an artificial intelligence chatbot program. The text of the notice must appear in the same language the chatbot is using and in a size easily readable by the average viewer. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Companion chatbot; warning required; users who are minors. new text end new text begin (a) A proprietor of a companion chatbot must make a prudent and good faith effort consistent with industry standards and use existing technology, available resources, and known, established, or readily attainable techniques to prevent the companion chatbot from promoting, causing, or aiding self-harm, and determine whether a covered user is expressing thoughts of self-harm. Upon determining that a companion chatbot has promoted, caused, or aided self-harm, or that a covered user is expressing thoughts of self-harm, the proprietor must prohibit continued use of the companion chatbot for a period of at least 72 hours and prominently display contact information for a suicide crisis organization to the covered user. new text end new text begin (b) If a proprietor of a companion chatbot fails to comply with this section, the proprietor is liable to users who inflict self-harm, in whole or in part, as a result of the proprietor's companion chatbot promoting, causing, or aiding the user to inflict self-harm. Irrespective of the proprietor's compliance with this subdivision, a proprietor is liable for general and special damages to covered users who inflict self-harm, in whole or in part, when the proprietor: new text end new text begin (1) has actual knowledge that: new text end new text begin (i) the companion chatbot is promoting, causing, or aiding self-harm; or new text end new text begin (ii) a covered user is expressing thoughts of self-harm; new text end new text begin (2) fails to prohibit continued use of the companion chatbot for a period of at least 72 hours; and new text end new text begin (3) fails to prominently display to the user a means to contact a suicide crisis organization. new text end new text begin A proprietor of a companion chatbot may not waive or disclaim liability under this subdivision. new text end new text begin (c) A proprietor of a companion chatbot must make a prudent and good faith effort consistent with industry standards and use existing technology, available resources, and known, established, or readily attainable techniques to determine whether a user is a minor. A proprietor is strictly liable for any harm caused if the proprietor fails to comply with this subdivision and a minor user inflicts self-harm, in whole or in part, as a result of the proprietor's companion chatbot. A proprietor of a companion chatbot may not waive or disclaim liability under this subdivision. The proprietor of a companion chatbot must make a prudent and good faith effort consistent with industry standards and use existing technology, available resources, and known, established, or readily attainable techniques to discover vulnerabilities in the proprietor's system, including any methods used to determine whether a covered user is a minor. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2026, and applies to actions taken by a proprietor on or after that date. new text end